Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,162
Drugs; medical treatment protocols.

The medical director shall develop and implement medical treatment protocols regarding the use of drugs, devices, or biologicals for the treatment of inmates and shall ensure that those protocols are consistent with a community standard of health care. In developing these protocols, the medical director shall ensure that the medical treatment protocols include:

(1) Provisions requiring that only the relevant health care staff is involved in determining the number and dosages of the drugs, devices, or biologicals to be received by inmates under their care;

(2) Provisions establishing a system for monitoring the administration of drugs, devices, or biologicals to ensure that all prescribed drugs, devices, or biologicals are made available to the inmates; and

(3) Provisions establishing a system for monitoring and removing expired drugs, devices, or biologicals within the department's medication inventory which conforms with the requirements of section 71-2413.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 10.